Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Mississippi Registration Law
[Repealed]

§§ 23-5-301 through 23-5-313.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-5-301. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-501; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 501]

§23-5-303. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-502; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 502; Laws, 1975, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 1]

§23-5-305. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-503; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 503; Laws, 1975, ch. 502, § 2]

§23-5-307. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-504; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 504]

§23-5-309. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-505; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 505]

§23-5-311. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-601; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 601]

§23-5-312. [Laws, 1975, ch. 503, § 3]

§23-5-313. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-603; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 603]